Nebraska, session 109, LB542.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB542 LB542
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 14-2113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-2113 The board of directors of the metropolitan utilities
district shall have general charge, supervision, and control of all
matters pertaining to the natural gas supply and the water supply of the
district for domestic, mechanical, public, and fire purposes. This shall
include the general charge, supervision, and control of the design,
construction, operation, maintenance, and extension or improvement of the
necessary plant to supply natural gas, to develop power, and to pump
water. It shall have the authority to enter upon and utilize streets,
alleys, and public grounds therefor upon due notice to the proper
authorities controlling same, subject to the provisions of sections
39-1361 and 39-1362, except that while any permit hereafter granted by
the Department of Transportation under such provisions shall not be
construed to be a contract as referred to within the provisions of
section 39-1304.02, such parties may separately contract in relation to
relocation of facilities and reimbursement therefor. The board shall also
have the power to appropriate private property required by the district
for natural gas and water service, to purchase and contract for necessary
materials, labor, and supplies, and to supply water and natural gas
without the district upon such terms and conditions as it may deem
proper. The authority and power conferred in this section upon the board
of directors shall extend as far beyond the corporate limits of the
metropolitan utilities district as the board may deem necessary.
Sec. 2. Section 39-1304.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
39-1304.02 (1) Whenever any qualifying utility facility which now
is, or hereafter may be, located in, over, along, or under any highway or
urban extension thereof which is a part of the National System of
Interstate and Defense Highways as defined in the Federal Aid Highway Act
of 1956, and qualifying for federal aid thereunder, or any highway which
-2-

LB542 LB542
2025 2025
at any time was on or designated as a part of the National System of
Interstate and Defense Highways but has been removed for any reason, is
required to be altered, changed, moved, or relocated for the construction
of any federal-aid highway project described in subdivisions (2)(b)(i)
through (v) of this section, the cost of such alteration, change, moving,
or relocation, and the expense of acquiring lands or any rights and
interests in land or any other rights acquired to accomplish such
alteration, change, moving, or relocation, shall be paid by the state as
a part of the expense of such project, notwithstanding any rule, permit,
agreement, franchise, or other authorization or law to the contrary.
federally aided projects except when such payment to the utility would
violate a legal contract between the utility and the state, or between
the utility and a county, city, or village of the state, under the
express terms of which contract the utility specifically agrees to pay or
assume such costs of alteration, change, moving, or relocation. The cost
of the alteration, change, moving, or relocation, and the expense of
acquiring lands or any rights and interests in land or any other rights
required to accomplish such alteration, change, moving, or relocation of
a utility facility located in, over, along, or under any highway which at
any time was on or designated as a part of the National System of
Interstate and Defense Highways but has been removed for any reason shall
not be paid by the state on or after July 1, 1993, and the total amount
paid from May 5, 1983, until July 1, 1993, including any federal-aid
funds, shall not exceed five million dollars.
(2) For purposes the purpose of this section: ,
(a) Cost includes the term cost of relocation shall include the
entire amount paid by a such utility properly attributable to any such
alteration, change, moving, or relocation after deducting therefrom any
increase in value of the new facility and any salvage value derived from
the old facility; .
(b) Qualifying utility facility means any utility facility that is
-3-

LB542 LB542
2025 2025
located in, over, along, or under any:
(i) Highway that or urban extension of any highway that is a part of
the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways as defined in and
qualifies for federal aid under the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1956;
(ii) Highway that or urban extension of any highway that at any time
was on or designated as a part of the National System of Interstate and
Defense Highways but has been removed for any reason;
(iii) Highway;
(iv) Part of the state highway system; or
(v) Road that, street that, or right-of-way that is under the
primary authority of a county, city, or village; and
(c) Utility facility includes:
(i) Any facility of a commercial broadband supplier as defined in
section 86-5,104; and
(ii) Any facility of a community antenna television service as
described in section 18-2201.
Sec. 3. Original sections 14-2113 and 39-1304.02, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-